sv: Monteringssätt för stämskruv (gitarr): 1-skruv; 2-stift (utan skruv); 2-skruv; F-stil (kapslad); Modern iskruvad sexkantsbussning; Vintage inpressad bussning; Övrigt
lt-LT: Gitaros derinimo kaiščio tvirtinimo tipas: 1 varžtas; 2 kaiščiai (be varžto); 2 varžtai; F-stiliaus (sandarūs); Moderni įsukama šešiakampė įvorė; Vintažinė įspaudžiama įvorė; Kita
bg-BG: Стил на монтаж на ключовете за китара: С 1 винт; С 2 щифта (без винтове); С 2 винта; F-style (капсуловани); Модерна втулка на винт с шестостен; Винтидж втулка с набиване; Други
nl: Montagestijl gitaarstemmechaniek: 1-schroef; 2-pins (zonder schroef); 2-schroef; F-stijl (gesloten); Moderne inschroef zeskantbus; Vintage inpersbus; Overig
zh-TW: 吉他調音釘安裝樣式: 1 顆螺絲; 2 針 (無螺絲); 2 顆螺絲; F 型 (密封式); 現代鎖入式六角襯套; 復古壓入式襯套; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl upevnenia ladiacich kolíkov na gitare: 1 skrutka; 2 kolíky (bez skrutky); 2 skrutky; Štýl F (uzavreté); Moderné skrutkovacie šesťhranné puzdro; Vintage vtláčacie puzdro; Iné
pl: Styl montażu klucza stroikowego gitary: Na 1 śrubę; Na 2 piny (bez śrub); Na 2 śruby; Typu F (zamknięte); Nowoczesna wkręcana tuleja sześciokątna; Tradycyjna wciskana tuleja; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação das cravelhas da guitarra: 1 parafuso; 2 pinos (sem parafuso); 2 parafusos; Estilo F (selado); Bucha sextavada roscada moderna; Bucha de encaixe vintage; Outro
it: Stile di montaggio della meccanica della chitarra: 1 vite; 2 perni (senza viti); 2 viti; Stile F (sigillato); Boccola esagonale moderna avvitabile; Boccola a pressione vintage; Altro
de: Befestigungsart der Gitarrenstimmwirbel: 1 Schraube; 2-Pin (ohne Schraube); 2 Schrauben; F-Style (versiegelt); Moderne Sechskant-Einschraubhülse; Vintage-Einpresshülse; Sonstige
el: Τύπος στερέωσης κλειδιών κουρδίσματος κιθάρας: 1 βίδας; 2 ακίδων (χωρίς βίδα); 2 βιδών; Τύπου F (κλειστού τύπου); Μοντέρνο βιδωτό εξάγωνο δαχτυλίδι; Vintage πρεσαριστό δαχτυλίδι; Άλλο
ja: ギターチューニングペグマウントスタイル: 1点留め; 2ピン (ネジなし); 2点留め; Fスタイル (密閉型); モダン (ネジ込み式六角ブッシュ); ビンテージ (圧入式ブッシュ); その他
ro-RO: Stil de montare a cheilor de acordare pentru chitară: Cu 1 șurub; Cu 2 pini (fără șurub); Cu 2 șuruburi; Tip F (sigilat); Bucșă hexagonală modernă cu înfiletare; Bucșă vintage prin presare; Altele
fr: Guitar tuning peg mounting style: 1 vis; 2 broches (sans vis); 2 vis; Style F (scellé); Douille hexagonale à visser moderne; Douille à enfoncer vintage; Autre
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งลูกบิดปรับสายกีตาร์: สกรู 1 ตัว; หมุด 2 ตัว (ไม่มีสกรู); สกรู 2 ตัว; F-style (ซีล); ปลอกหกเหลี่ยมแบบขันสกรูสไตล์โมเดิร์น; ปลอกแบบกดเข้าสไตล์วินเทจ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem das tarraxas de guitarra: 1 parafuso; 2 pinos (sem parafuso); 2 parafusos; Estilo F (blindada); Bucha hexagonal rosqueável moderna; Bucha de pressão vintage; Outro
hu: Gitárkulcs rögzítési stílusa: 1 csavaros; 2 csapos (csavar nélküli); 2 csavaros; F-stílusú (zárt); Modern becsavarható, hatlapfejű persely; Vintage bepréselhető persely; Egyéb
tr: Gitar burgusu montaj stili: 1 vidalı; 2 pimli (vidasız); 2 vidalı; F stili (kapalı); Modern vidalı altıgen burç; Vintage presli burç; Diğer
es: Estilo de montaje de las clavijas de la guitarra: 1 tornillo; 2 pasadores (sin tornillo); 2 tornillos; Estilo F (sellado); Buje hexagonal enroscable moderno; Buje a presión vintage; Otro
ko: 기타 조율용 페그 장착 스타일: 1 스크류; 2핀(나사 없음); 2 스크류; F-스타일(실드); 모던 스크류 인 헥스 부싱; 빈티지 프레스 인 부싱; 기타
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt chốt lên dây guitar: 1 ốc vít; 2 chốt (không ốc vít); 2 ốc vít; Kiểu F (kín); Ống lót lục giác xoắn kiểu hiện đại; Ống lót nhấn kiểu cổ điển; Khác
zh-CN: 吉他卷弦扭安装方式: 单螺丝; 双销（无螺丝）; 双螺丝; F 型（封闭式）; 现代旋入式六角套管; 复古压入式套管; 其他
da: Monteringsstil for stemmeskrue til guitar: 1 skrue; 2 stifter (uden skrue); 2 skruer; F-stil (forseglet); Moderne indskruningsbøsning med sekskant; Vintage press-in-bøsning; Andet
nb: Monteringsstil for gitar-stemmepinne: 1 skrue; 2 pinner (uten skruer); 2 skruer; F-stil (lukket); Moderne innskrudd sekskantfôring; Vintage innpresset fôring; Annet
fi: Kitaran viritysnupin kiinnitystyyppi: 1-ruuvinen; 2-tappinen (ei ruuvia); 2-ruuvinen; F-tyyli (suljettu); Moderni ruuvattava kuusiomutteri; Vintage painettava holkki; Muu
sl-SI: Stil montaže količev za uglaševanje za kitaro: Z 1 vijakom; Z 2 zatičema (brez vijaka); Z 2 vijakoma; V slogu F (zaprto); Sodobna navojna šesterokotna puša; Vintage stisljiva puša; Drugo
cs: Způsob upevnění ladicích kolíků na kytaře: 1 šroub; 2 kolíky (bez šroubu); 2 šrouby; F-style (uzavřené); Moderní šroubovací šestihranné pouzdro; Vintage narážecí pouzdro; Jiné
ru: Стиль крепления колков: На 1 винте; 2 штифта (без винта); На 2 винтах; F-стиль (закрытый); Современная ввинчивающаяся шестигранная втулка; Винтажная запрессовываемая втулка; Другое
hr-HR: Stil montaže gitarskih ključeva za ugađanje: 1 vijak; 2 klina (bez vijka); 2 vijka; F-stil (zatvorene); Moderna šesterokutna matica na uvrtanje; Vintage utisna matica; Ostalo
en: Guitar tuning peg mounting style: 1-screw; 2-pin (no screw); 2-screw; F-style (sealed); Modern screw-in hex bushing; Vintage press-in bushing; Other